Missouri, session 2026, SB1263.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 208.152, RSMo, is repealed and two new
2 sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
3 208.152 and 376.1293, to read as follows:
1 208.152. 1. MO HealthNet payments shall be made on
2 behalf of those eligible needy persons as described in
3 section 208.151 who are unable to provide for it in whole or
4 in part, with any payments to be made on the basis of the
5 reasonable cost of the care or reasonable charge for the
6 services as defined and determined by the MO HealthNet
7 division, unless otherwise hereinafter provided, for the
8 following:
9 (1) Inpatient hospital services, except to persons in
10 an institution for mental diseases who are under the age of
11 sixty-five years and over the age of twenty-one years;
12 provided that the MO HealthNet division shall provide
13 through rule and regulation an exception process for
14 coverage of inpatient costs in those cases requiring
15 treatment beyond the seventy-fifth percentile professional
16 activities study (PAS) or the MO HealthNet children's
17 diagnosis length-of-stay schedule; and provided further that

SB 1263 2
18 the MO HealthNet division shall take into account through
19 its payment system for hospital services the situation of
20 hospitals which serve a disproportionate number of low-
21 income patients;
22 (2) All outpatient hospital services, payments
23 therefor to be in amounts which represent no more than
24 eighty percent of the lesser of reasonable costs or
25 customary charges for such services, determined in
26 accordance with the principles set forth in Title XVIII A
27 and B, Public Law 89-97, 1965 amendments to the federal
28 Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 301, et seq.), but
29 the MO HealthNet division may evaluate outpatient hospital
30 services rendered under this section and deny payment for
31 services which are determined by the MO HealthNet division
32 not to be medically necessary, in accordance with federal
33 law and regulations;
34 (3) Laboratory and X-ray services;
35 (4) Nursing home services for participants, except to
36 persons with more than five hundred thousand dollars equity
37 in their home or except for persons in an institution for
38 mental diseases who are under the age of sixty-five years,
39 when residing in a hospital licensed by the department of
40 health and senior services or a nursing home licensed by the
41 department of health and senior services or appropriate
42 licensing authority of other states or government-owned and -
43 operated institutions which are determined to conform to
44 standards equivalent to licensing requirements in Title XIX
45 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396,
46 et seq.), as amended, for nursing facilities. The MO
47 HealthNet division may recognize through its payment
48 methodology for nursing facilities those nursing facilities
49 which serve a high volume of MO HealthNet patients. The MO

SB 1263 3
50 HealthNet division when determining the amount of the
51 benefit payments to be made on behalf of persons under the
52 age of twenty-one in a nursing facility may consider nursing
53 facilities furnishing care to persons under the age of
54 twenty-one as a classification separate from other nursing
55 facilities;
56 (5) Nursing home costs for participants receiving
57 benefit payments under subdivision (4) of this subsection
58 for those days, which shall not exceed twelve per any period
59 of six consecutive months, during which the participant is
60 on a temporary leave of absence from the hospital or nursing
61 home, provided that no such participant shall be allowed a
62 temporary leave of absence unless it is specifically
63 provided for in his plan of care. As used in this
64 subdivision, the term "temporary leave of absence" shall
65 include all periods of time during which a participant is
66 away from the hospital or nursing home overnight because he
67 is visiting a friend or relative;
68 (6) Physicians' services, whether furnished in the
69 office, home, hospital, nursing home, or elsewhere,
70 provided, that no funds shall be expended to any abortion
71 facility, as defined in section 188.015, or to any
72 affiliate, as defined in section 188.015, of such abortion
73 facility;
74 (7) Subject to appropriation, up to twenty visits per
75 year for services limited to examinations, diagnoses,
76 adjustments, and manipulations and treatments of
77 malpositioned articulations and structures of the body
78 provided by licensed chiropractic physicians practicing
79 within their scope of practice. Nothing in this subdivision
80 shall be interpreted to otherwise expand MO HealthNet
81 services;

SB 1263 4
82 (8) Drugs and medicines when prescribed by a licensed
83 physician, dentist, podiatrist, or an advanced practice
84 registered nurse; except that no payment for drugs and
85 medicines prescribed on and after January 1, 2006, by a
86 licensed physician, dentist, podiatrist, or an advanced
87 practice registered nurse may be made on behalf of any
88 person who qualifies for prescription drug coverage under
89 the provisions of P.L. 108-173;
90 (9) Emergency ambulance services and, effective
91 January 1, 1990, medically necessary transportation to
92 scheduled, physician-prescribed nonelective treatments;
93 (10) Early and periodic screening and diagnosis of
94 individuals who are under the age of twenty-one to ascertain
95 their physical or mental defects, and health care,
96 treatment, and other measures to correct or ameliorate
97 defects and chronic conditions discovered thereby. Such
98 services shall be provided in accordance with the provisions
99 of Section 6403 of P.L. 101-239 and federal regulations
100 promulgated thereunder;
101 (11) Home health care services;
102 (12) Family planning as defined by federal rules and
103 regulations; provided, that no funds shall be expended to
104 any abortion facility, as defined in section 188.015, or to
105 any affiliate, as defined in section 188.015, of such
106 abortion facility; and further provided, however, that such
107 family planning services shall not include abortions or any
108 abortifacient drug or device that is used for the purpose of
109 inducing an abortion unless such abortions are certified in
110 writing by a physician to the MO HealthNet agency that, in
111 the physician's professional judgment, the life of the
112 mother would be endangered if the fetus were carried to term;

SB 1263 5
113 (13) Inpatient psychiatric hospital services for
114 individuals under age twenty-one as defined in Title XIX of
115 the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d, et
116 seq.);
117 (14) Outpatient surgical procedures, including
118 presurgical diagnostic services performed in ambulatory
119 surgical facilities which are licensed by the department of
120 health and senior services of the state of Missouri; except,
121 that such outpatient surgical services shall not include
122 persons who are eligible for coverage under Part B of Title
123 XVIII, Public Law 89-97, 1965 amendments to the federal
124 Social Security Act, as amended, if exclusion of such
125 persons is permitted under Title XIX, Public Law 89-97, 1965
126 amendments to the federal Social Security Act, as amended;
127 (15) Personal care services which are medically
128 oriented tasks having to do with a person's physical
129 requirements, as opposed to housekeeping requirements, which
130 enable a person to be treated by his or her physician on an
131 outpatient rather than on an inpatient or residential basis
132 in a hospital, intermediate care facility, or skilled
133 nursing facility. Personal care services shall be rendered
134 by an individual not a member of the participant's family
135 who is qualified to provide such services where the services
136 are prescribed by a physician in accordance with a plan of
137 treatment and are supervised by a licensed nurse. Persons
138 eligible to receive personal care services shall be those
139 persons who would otherwise require placement in a hospital,
140 intermediate care facility, or skilled nursing facility.
141 Benefits payable for personal care services shall not exceed
142 for any one participant one hundred percent of the average
143 statewide charge for care and treatment in an intermediate
144 care facility for a comparable period of time. Such

SB 1263 6
145 services, when delivered in a residential care facility or
146 assisted living facility licensed under chapter 198 shall be
147 authorized on a tier level based on the services the
148 resident requires and the frequency of the services. A
149 resident of such facility who qualifies for assistance under
150 section 208.030 shall, at a minimum, if prescribed by a
151 physician, qualify for the tier level with the fewest
152 services. The rate paid to providers for each tier of
153 service shall be set subject to appropriations. Subject to
154 appropriations, each resident of such facility who qualifies
155 for assistance under section 208.030 and meets the level of
156 care required in this section shall, at a minimum, if
157 prescribed by a physician, be authorized up to one hour of
158 personal care services per day. Authorized units of
159 personal care services shall not be reduced or tier level
160 lowered unless an order approving such reduction or lowering
161 is obtained from the resident's personal physician. Such
162 authorized units of personal care services or tier level
163 shall be transferred with such resident if he or she
164 transfers to another such facility. Such provision shall
165 terminate upon receipt of relevant waivers from the federal
166 Department of Health and Human Services. If the Centers for
167 Medicare and Medicaid Services determines that such
168 provision does not comply with the state plan, this
169 provision shall be null and void. The MO HealthNet division
170 shall notify the revisor of statutes as to whether the
171 relevant waivers are approved or a determination of
172 noncompliance is made;
173 (16) Mental health services. The state plan for
174 providing medical assistance under Title XIX of the Social
175 Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1396, et seq., as amended,
176 shall include the following mental health services when such

SB 1263 7
177 services are provided by community mental health facilities
178 operated by the department of mental health or designated by
179 the department of mental health as a community mental health
180 facility or as an alcohol and drug abuse facility or as a
181 child-serving agency within the comprehensive children's
182 mental health service system established in section
183 630.097. The department of mental health shall establish by
184 administrative rule the definition and criteria for
185 designation as a community mental health facility and for
186 designation as an alcohol and drug abuse facility. Such
187 mental health services shall include:
188 (a) Outpatient mental health services including
189 preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, and
190 palliative interventions rendered to individuals in an
191 individual or group setting by a mental health professional
192 in accordance with a plan of treatment appropriately
193 established, implemented, monitored, and revised under the
194 auspices of a therapeutic team as a part of client services
195 management;
196 (b) Clinic mental health services including
197 preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, and
198 palliative interventions rendered to individuals in an
199 individual or group setting by a mental health professional
200 in accordance with a plan of treatment appropriately
201 established, implemented, monitored, and revised under the
202 auspices of a therapeutic team as a part of client services
203 management;
204 (c) Rehabilitative mental health and alcohol and drug
205 abuse services including home and community-based
206 preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, and
207 palliative interventions rendered to individuals in an
208 individual or group setting by a mental health or alcohol

SB 1263 8
209 and drug abuse professional in accordance with a plan of
210 treatment appropriately established, implemented, monitored,
211 and revised under the auspices of a therapeutic team as a
212 part of client services management. As used in this
213 section, mental health professional and alcohol and drug
214 abuse professional shall be defined by the department of
215 mental health pursuant to duly promulgated rules. With
216 respect to services established by this subdivision, the
217 department of social services, MO HealthNet division, shall
218 enter into an agreement with the department of mental
219 health. Matching funds for outpatient mental health
220 services, clinic mental health services, and rehabilitation
221 services for mental health and alcohol and drug abuse shall
222 be certified by the department of mental health to the MO
223 HealthNet division. The agreement shall establish a
224 mechanism for the joint implementation of the provisions of
225 this subdivision. In addition, the agreement shall
226 establish a mechanism by which rates for services may be
227 jointly developed;
228 (17) Such additional services as defined by the MO
229 HealthNet division to be furnished under waivers of federal
230 statutory requirements as provided for and authorized by the
231 federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 301, et seq.)
232 subject to appropriation by the general assembly;
233 (18) The services of an advanced practice registered
234 nurse with a collaborative practice agreement to the extent
235 that such services are provided in accordance with chapters
236 334 and 335, and regulations promulgated thereunder;
237 (19) Nursing home costs for participants receiving
238 benefit payments under subdivision (4) of this subsection to
239 reserve a bed for the participant in the nursing home during
240 the time that the participant is absent due to admission to

SB 1263 9
241 a hospital for services which cannot be performed on an
242 outpatient basis, subject to the provisions of this
243 subdivision:
244 (a) The provisions of this subdivision shall apply
245 only if:
246 a. The occupancy rate of the nursing home is at or
247 above ninety-seven percent of MO HealthNet certified
248 licensed beds, according to the most recent quarterly census
249 provided to the department of health and senior services
250 which was taken prior to when the participant is admitted to
251 the hospital; and
252 b. The patient is admitted to a hospital for a medical
253 condition with an anticipated stay of three days or less;
254 (b) The payment to be made under this subdivision
255 shall be provided for a maximum of three days per hospital
256 stay;
257 (c) For each day that nursing home costs are paid on
258 behalf of a participant under this subdivision during any
259 period of six consecutive months such participant shall,
260 during the same period of six consecutive months, be
261 ineligible for payment of nursing home costs of two
262 otherwise available temporary leave of absence days provided
263 under subdivision (5) of this subsection; and
264 (d) The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply
265 unless the nursing home receives notice from the participant
266 or the participant's responsible party that the participant
267 intends to return to the nursing home following the hospital
268 stay. If the nursing home receives such notification and
269 all other provisions of this subsection have been satisfied,
270 the nursing home shall provide notice to the participant or
271 the participant's responsible party prior to release of the
272 reserved bed;

SB 1263 10
273 (20) Prescribed medically necessary durable medical
274 equipment. An electronic web-based prior authorization
275 system using best medical evidence and care and treatment
276 guidelines consistent with national standards shall be used
277 to verify medical need;
278 (21) Hospice care. As used in this subdivision, the
279 term "hospice care" means a coordinated program of active
280 professional medical attention within a home, outpatient and
281 inpatient care which treats the terminally ill patient and
282 family as a unit, employing a medically directed
283 interdisciplinary team. The program provides relief of
284 severe pain or other physical symptoms and supportive care
285 to meet the special needs arising out of physical,
286 psychological, spiritual, social, and economic stresses
287 which are experienced during the final stages of illness,
288 and during dying and bereavement and meets the Medicare
289 requirements for participation as a hospice as are provided
290 in 42 CFR Part 418. The rate of reimbursement paid by the
291 MO HealthNet division to the hospice provider for room and
292 board furnished by a nursing home to an eligible hospice
293 patient shall not be less than ninety-five percent of the
294 rate of reimbursement which would have been paid for
295 facility services in that nursing home facility for that
296 patient, in accordance with subsection (c) of Section 6408
297 of P.L. 101-239 (Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1989);
298 (22) Prescribed medically necessary dental services.
299 Such services shall be subject to appropriations. An
300 electronic web-based prior authorization system using best
301 medical evidence and care and treatment guidelines
302 consistent with national standards shall be used to verify
303 medical need;

SB 1263 11
304 (23) Prescribed medically necessary optometric
305 services. Such services shall be subject to
306 appropriations. An electronic web-based prior authorization
307 system using best medical evidence and care and treatment
308 guidelines consistent with national standards shall be used
309 to verify medical need;
310 (24) Blood clotting products-related services. For
311 persons diagnosed with a bleeding disorder, as defined in
312 section 338.400, reliant on blood clotting products, as
313 defined in section 338.400, such services include:
314 (a) Home delivery of blood clotting products and
315 ancillary infusion equipment and supplies, including the
316 emergency deliveries of the product when medically necessary;
317 (b) Medically necessary ancillary infusion equipment
318 and supplies required to administer the blood clotting
319 products; and
320 (c) Assessments conducted in the participant's home by
321 a pharmacist, nurse, or local home health care agency
322 trained in bleeding disorders when deemed necessary by the
323 participant's treating physician;
324 (25) Medically necessary cochlear implants and hearing
325 instruments, as defined in section 345.015, that are:
326 (a) Prescribed by an audiologist, as defined in
327 section 345.015; or
328 (b) Dispensed by a hearing instrument specialist, as
329 defined in section 346.010;
330 (26) The MO HealthNet division shall, by January 1,
331 2008, and annually thereafter, report the status of MO
332 HealthNet provider reimbursement rates as compared to one
333 hundred percent of the Medicare reimbursement rates and
334 compared to the average dental reimbursement rates paid by
335 third-party payors licensed by the state. The MO HealthNet

SB 1263 12
336 division shall, by July 1, 2008, provide to the general
337 assembly a four-year plan to achieve parity with Medicare
338 reimbursement rates and for third-party payor average dental
339 reimbursement rates. Such plan shall be subject to
340 appropriation and the division shall include in its annual
341 budget request to the governor the necessary funding needed
342 to complete the four-year plan developed under this
343 subdivision;
344 (27) Coverage for medically necessary physician-
345 prescribed treatment for pediatric autoimmune
346 neuropsychiatric disorders associated with streptococcal
347 infections (PANDAS) and pediatric acute-onset
348 neuropsychiatric syndrome (PANS) as described in section
349 376.1293.
350 2. Additional benefit payments for medical assistance
351 shall be made on behalf of those eligible needy children,
352 pregnant women and blind persons with any payments to be
353 made on the basis of the reasonable cost of the care or
354 reasonable charge for the services as defined and determined
355 by the MO HealthNet division, unless otherwise hereinafter
356 provided, for the following:
357 (1) Dental services;
358 (2) Services of podiatrists as defined in section
359 330.010;
360 (3) Optometric services as described in section
361 336.010;
362 (4) Orthopedic devices or other prosthetics, including
363 eye glasses, dentures, and wheelchairs;
364 (5) Hospice care. As used in this subdivision, the
365 term "hospice care" means a coordinated program of active
366 professional medical attention within a home, outpatient and
367 inpatient care which treats the terminally ill patient and

SB 1263 13
368 family as a unit, employing a medically directed
369 interdisciplinary team. The program provides relief of
370 severe pain or other physical symptoms and supportive care
371 to meet the special needs arising out of physical,
372 psychological, spiritual, social, and economic stresses
373 which are experienced during the final stages of illness,
374 and during dying and bereavement and meets the Medicare
375 requirements for participation as a hospice as are provided
376 in 42 CFR Part 418. The rate of reimbursement paid by the
377 MO HealthNet division to the hospice provider for room and
378 board furnished by a nursing home to an eligible hospice
379 patient shall not be less than ninety-five percent of the
380 rate of reimbursement which would have been paid for
381 facility services in that nursing home facility for that
382 patient, in accordance with subsection (c) of Section 6408
383 of P.L. 101-239 (Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1989);
384 (6) Comprehensive day rehabilitation services
385 beginning early posttrauma as part of a coordinated system
386 of care for individuals with disabling impairments.
387 Rehabilitation services must be based on an individualized,
388 goal-oriented, comprehensive and coordinated treatment plan
389 developed, implemented, and monitored through an
390 interdisciplinary assessment designed to restore an
391 individual to optimal level of physical, cognitive, and
392 behavioral function. The MO HealthNet division shall
393 establish by administrative rule the definition and criteria
394 for designation of a comprehensive day rehabilitation
395 service facility, benefit limitations and payment
396 mechanism. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
397 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
398 authority delegated in this subdivision shall become
399 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of

SB 1263 14
400 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
401 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
402 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
403 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
404 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
405 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
406 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
407 2005, shall be invalid and void.
408 3. The MO HealthNet division may require any
409 participant receiving MO HealthNet benefits to pay part of
410 the charge or cost until July 1, 2008, and an additional
411 payment after July 1, 2008, as defined by rule duly
412 promulgated by the MO HealthNet division, for all covered
413 services except for those services covered under
414 subdivisions (15) and (16) of subsection 1 of this section
415 and sections 208.631 to 208.657 to the extent and in the
416 manner authorized by Title XIX of the federal Social
417 Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396, et seq.) and
418 regulations thereunder. When substitution of a generic drug
419 is permitted by the prescriber according to section 338.056,
420 and a generic drug is substituted for a name-brand drug, the
421 MO HealthNet division may not lower or delete the
422 requirement to make a co-payment pursuant to regulations of
423 Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. A provider of
424 goods or services described under this section must collect
425 from all participants the additional payment that may be
426 required by the MO HealthNet division under authority
427 granted herein, if the division exercises that authority, to
428 remain eligible as a provider. Any payments made by
429 participants under this section shall be in addition to and
430 not in lieu of payments made by the state for goods or
431 services described herein except the participant portion of

SB 1263 15
432 the pharmacy professional dispensing fee shall be in
433 addition to and not in lieu of payments to pharmacists. A
434 provider may collect the co-payment at the time a service is
435 provided or at a later date. A provider shall not refuse to
436 provide a service if a participant is unable to pay a
437 required payment. If it is the routine business practice of
438 a provider to terminate future services to an individual
439 with an unclaimed debt, the provider may include uncollected
440 co-payments under this practice. Providers who elect not to
441 undertake the provision of services based on a history of
442 bad debt shall give participants advance notice and a
443 reasonable opportunity for payment. A provider,
444 representative, employee, independent contractor, or agent
445 of a pharmaceutical manufacturer shall not make co-payment
446 for a participant. This subsection shall not apply to other
447 qualified children, pregnant women, or blind persons. If
448 the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not
449 approve the MO HealthNet state plan amendment submitted by
450 the department of social services that would allow a
451 provider to deny future services to an individual with
452 uncollected co-payments, the denial of services shall not be
453 allowed. The department of social services shall inform
454 providers regarding the acceptability of denying services as
455 the result of unpaid co-payments.
456 4. The MO HealthNet division shall have the right to
457 collect medication samples from participants in order to
458 maintain program integrity.
459 5. Reimbursement for obstetrical and pediatric
460 services under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of this
461 section shall be timely and sufficient to enlist enough
462 health care providers so that care and services are
463 available under the state plan for MO HealthNet benefits at

SB 1263 16
464 least to the extent that such care and services are
465 available to the general population in the geographic area,
466 as required under subparagraph (a)(30)(A) of 42 U.S.C.
467 Section 1396a and federal regulations promulgated thereunder.
468 6. Beginning July 1, 1990, reimbursement for services
469 rendered in federally funded health centers shall be in
470 accordance with the provisions of subsection 6402(c) and
471 Section 6404 of P.L. 101-239 (Omnibus Budget Reconciliation
472 Act of 1989) and federal regulations promulgated thereunder.
473 7. Beginning July 1, 1990, the department of social
474 services shall provide notification and referral of children
475 below age five, and pregnant, breast-feeding, or postpartum
476 women who are determined to be eligible for MO HealthNet
477 benefits under section 208.151 to the special supplemental
478 food programs for women, infants and children administered
479 by the department of health and senior services. Such
480 notification and referral shall conform to the requirements
481 of Section 6406 of P.L. 101-239 and regulations promulgated
482 thereunder.
483 8. Providers of long-term care services shall be
484 reimbursed for their costs in accordance with the provisions
485 of Section 1902 (a)(13)(A) of the Social Security Act, 42
486 U.S.C. Section 1396a, as amended, and regulations
487 promulgated thereunder.
488 9. Reimbursement rates to long-term care providers
489 with respect to a total change in ownership, at arm's
490 length, for any facility previously licensed and certified
491 for participation in the MO HealthNet program shall not
492 increase payments in excess of the increase that would
493 result from the application of Section 1902 (a)(13)(C) of
494 the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1396a (a)(13)(C).

SB 1263 17
495 10. The MO HealthNet division may enroll qualified
496 residential care facilities and assisted living facilities,
497 as defined in chapter 198, as MO HealthNet personal care
498 providers.
499 11. Any income earned by individuals eligible for
500 certified extended employment at a sheltered workshop under
501 chapter 178 shall not be considered as income for purposes
502 of determining eligibility under this section.
503 12. If the Missouri Medicaid audit and compliance unit
504 changes any interpretation or application of the
505 requirements for reimbursement for MO HealthNet services
506 from the interpretation or application that has been applied
507 previously by the state in any audit of a MO HealthNet
508 provider, the Missouri Medicaid audit and compliance unit
509 shall notify all affected MO HealthNet providers five
510 business days before such change shall take effect. Failure
511 of the Missouri Medicaid audit and compliance unit to notify
512 a provider of such change shall entitle the provider to
513 continue to receive and retain reimbursement until such
514 notification is provided and shall waive any liability of
515 such provider for recoupment or other loss of any payments
516 previously made prior to the five business days after such
517 notice has been sent. Each provider shall provide the
518 Missouri Medicaid audit and compliance unit a valid email
519 address and shall agree to receive communications
520 electronically. The notification required under this
521 section shall be delivered in writing by the United States
522 Postal Service or electronic mail to each provider.
523 13. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
524 abrogate or limit the department's statutory requirement to
525 promulgate rules under chapter 536.

SB 1263 18
526 14. Beginning July 1, 2016, and subject to
527 appropriations, providers of behavioral, social, and
528 psychophysiological services for the prevention, treatment,
529 or management of physical health problems shall be
530 reimbursed utilizing the behavior assessment and
531 intervention reimbursement codes 96150 to 96154 or their
532 successor codes under the Current Procedural Terminology
533 (CPT) coding system. Providers eligible for such
534 reimbursement shall include psychologists.
535 15. There shall be no payments made under this section
536 for gender transition surgeries, cross-sex hormones, or
537 puberty-blocking drugs, as such terms are defined in section
538 191.1720, for the purpose of a gender transition.
1 376.1293. 1. This act shall be known and may be cited
2 as "Colton's Law".
3 2. Each health carrier of health benefit plans that
4 offers or issues health benefit plans which are delivered,
5 issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on
6 or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for
7 medically necessary physician-prescribed treatment for
8 pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorders associated
9 with streptococcal infections (PANDAS) and pediatric acute-
10 onset neuropsychiatric syndrome (PANS). Coverage for such
11 treatment shall include, but not be limited to:
12 (1) Antibiotics;
13 (2) Medication;
14 (3) Behavioral therapies to manage neuropsychiatric
15 symptoms;
16 (4) Immunomodulating medicines;
17 (5) Plasma exchange; and
18 (6) Intravenous immunoglobulin therapy.

SB 1263 19
19 3. Benefits provided under this section shall not be
20 subject to any greater copayment, coinsurance, or deductible
21 than similar benefits provided by the health benefit plan.
22 Authorization for such benefits shall be provided in a
23 timely manner consistent with those provided for urgent
24 treatments.
25 4. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall not
26 deny or delay coverage for medically necessary treatment
27 under this section solely because the recipient previously
28 received treatment, including the same or similar treatment,
29 for PANDAS or PANS, or because the recipient has been
30 diagnosed with or received treatment for their condition
31 under a different diagnostic name, such as autoimmune
32 encephalopathy.
33 5. For the purposes of this section, coverage of
34 PANDAS and PANS shall adhere to the treatment
35 recommendations developed by a health care professional
36 consortium convened for the purpose of researching,
37 identifying, and publishing best practice standards for
38 diagnosis and treatment of such disorders that are
39 accessible for health care professionals and are based on
40 evidence of positive patient outcomes.
41 6. Coverage for a form of medically necessary
42 treatment under this section shall not be limited over the
43 lifetime of the recipient or by the duration of a policy
44 period.
45 7. The provisions of this section shall not be
46 construed to prohibit a health carrier or health benefit
47 plan from requesting treatment notes and information on the
48 anticipated duration of treatment and outcome.
49 8. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
50 supplemental insurance policy, including a life care

SB 1263 20
51 contract, accident-only policy, specified disease policy,
52 hospital policy providing a fixed daily benefit only,
53 Medicare supplement policy, long-term care policy, short-
54 term major medical policies of six months or less duration,
55 or any other supplemental policy as determined by the
56 director of the department of commerce and insurance.
✓